Hawaii, session 2025, SB1102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 261, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§261-     Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit; chief; term limits.  (a)  The director of transportation may appoint the fire chief of the Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit of the airports division of the department of transportation from a list of five qualified candidates submitted for consideration by the state fire council, subject to the advice and consent of the senate; provided that the director of transportation shall give strong consideration and prioritize the five qualified candidates submitted by the state fire council. (b)  Each appointed fire chief of the Hawaii state aircraft rescue fire fighting unit of the airports division of the department of transportation shall serve a term of four years.  No fire chief shall be appointed to more than two consecutive terms." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.